Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-522
Shotgun on highway; restrictions; violation; penalty.

It shall be unlawful to have or carry, except as permitted by law, any shotgun having shells in either the chamber, receiver, or magazine in or on any vehicle on any highway. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be fined at least fifty dollars.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 242.

A conviction for violating an Oklahoma statute prohibiting the transportation of a loaded pistol, rifle, or shotgun in a landborne motor vehicle over a public highway was sufficiently similar to this section to justify the denial of a concealed handgun permit application under section 69-2433(8). Shurigar v. Nebraska State Patrol, 293 Neb. 606, 879 N.W.2d 25 (2016).